Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 1. Old Age and Survivors Insurance.

Sec. 39.30.010.
Federal territorial agreement.

The director of finance, with the approval of the governor, may on behalf of the territory enter into an agreement with the Federal Security Administrator, consistent with AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

, for the purpose of extending the benefits of the federal old age and survivors insurance system to employees of the territory or a political subdivision with respect to services specified in the agreement that constitute employment.

The agreement may contain provisions relating to coverage, benefits, contributions, effective date, modification and termination of the agreement, administration, and other appropriate provisions that the parties agree upon, but, except as may be otherwise required under the Social Security Act as to the services to be covered, the agreement shall provide in effect that

benefits will be provided for employees whose services are covered by the agreement, and their dependents and survivors, on the same basis as though the services constituted employment within the meaning of 42 U.S.C. 401 — 433 (Title II, Social Security Act);

the territory will pay to the secretary of the treasury, as may be prescribed under 42 U.S.C. 301 — 1397f (Social Security Act), contributions with respect to wages equal to the sum of the taxes that would be imposed by 26 U.S.C. 3101 and 3111 (Federal Insurance Contributions Act) if the services covered by the agreement constituted employment within the meaning of that act;

the agreement shall be effective with respect to services in employment covered by the agreement performed from the date specified in it or, as to services to which the agreement is extended by a modification to it, from the date specified in the modification;

all services that constitute employment and are performed in the employ of the territory by employees of the territory shall be covered by the agreement; and

all services which (A) constitute employment, (B) are performed in the employ of a political subdivision of the territory, and (C) are covered by a plan which conforms to the agreement and is approved as set out in AS

39.30.030

shall be covered by the agreement.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1957)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section gave the territory the legal authority to enter into an agreement extending the coverage of the federal Social Security Act to employees of the territory. The agreement was entered into on September 26, 1951, and is continued in effect by § 2, art. XV of the state constitution continuing contracts of the territory and making the state legal successor to the territory.
Since the agreement is in effect, the term “territory” has not been changed to “state” in this section. However, in AS

39.30.020

—

39.30.080

, which relate to the continuing coverage of the agreement, the change from “territory” to “state” has been made.

Section 7, Chapter 58, SLA 1979, provided for an election to decide if the state should withdraw from the federal Social Security System.
The election was held in September, 1979, and the state employees voted to withdraw.
Withdrawal from the federal Social Security System was subsequently accomplished. Consequently, the agreement in this section no longer has any application to employees of the state.

Cross references. —

For the supplemental benefits program that replaces Social Security for state employees, see AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

.

Collateral references. —

70A Am. Jur. 2d, Social Security and Medicare, § 1 et seq.

81 C.J.S. Social Security, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 39.30.020.
Contributions by employees.

An employee whose services are covered by an agreement under AS

39.30.010

shall pay for the period of coverage, into the state treasury, contributions equal to the amount of tax that would be imposed by 26 U.S.C. 3101 (Federal Insurance Contributions Act) if the services constituted employment within the meaning of that Act.

The contribution shall be collected by deducting the amount of the contribution from wages. Failure to make deduction does not relieve the employee from liability for the contribution.

If more or less than the correct amount of the contribution is paid or deducted, an adjustment or, if adjustment is impracticable, a refund shall be made without interest, in the manner prescribed by the department.

History.

(§ 4 ch 95 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1968; am § 80 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Sec. 39.30.030.
Plans for coverage of employees of political subdivisions.

A political subdivision of the state may submit for approval by the department a plan for extending the benefits of 42 U.S.C. 401 — 433 (Title II, Social Security Act) to its employees. A plan and an amendment to the plan shall be approved by the department if it finds that the plan or amendment

conforms with the requirements prescribed in regulations of the department;

conforms with the requirements of the Social Security Act and with the agreement entered into under AS

39.30.010

;

provides that services that constitute employment and are performed in the employ of the political subdivision by employees are covered by it;

specifies the source from which the funds necessary to make the payments required by (d) and (e) of this section are expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that the source will be adequate for the purpose;

provides for those methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision that the department finds are necessary for the proper and efficient administration of the plan;

provides that the political subdivision will make reports that the department requires, and will comply with requirements of the department or the Federal Security Administrator to assure the correctness and verification of the reports; and

authorizes the department to terminate the plan in its entirety in its discretion if it finds that there is a failure to comply substantially with a provision in the plan at the time and upon the notice and conditions provided by regulations of the department that are consistent with the Social Security Act.

The department may not refuse to approve a plan submitted by a political subdivision under (a) of this section, and may not terminate an approved plan, without reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to the political subdivision affected.

A political subdivision that has an approved plan shall pay contributions into the state treasury at the rates specified in the agreement and at the time which the department prescribes by regulation.

A political subdivision required to make payments under (c) of this section may, in consideration of the employee’s retention in, or entry into, employment after March 23, 1951, impose upon each of its employees, as to services that are covered by an approved plan, a contribution with respect to the employee’s wages, not exceeding the amount of tax that would be imposed by 26 U.S.C. 3101 (Federal Insurance Contributions Act) if the services constituted employment within the meaning of that act, and may deduct the amount of this contribution from the employee’s wages. Contributions so collected shall be paid into the state treasury in partial discharge of the liability of the political subdivision or instrumentality under (c) of this section. Failure to deduct the contribution does not relieve the employee or employer of liability for it.

A delinquent payment due under (c) of this section, with interest at the rate of six percent a year, may be recovered by action against the political subdivision liable for it or may, at the request of the department, be deducted from any other money payable to the political subdivision by a department or agency of the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 95 SLA 1951; am §§ 2, 3 ch 64 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1987, “(c)” was substituted for “(1)” in the second sentence of subsection (d) in order to correct a manifest error in the 1962 recodification.

Sec. 39.30.040.
Deposits and withdrawals.

Unless otherwise provided by law, there shall be deposited in the state treasury in trust all contributions collected under AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

.

The department has power, authority, and jurisdiction over this trust and may perform all acts whether or not specifically designated that are necessary to the administration of this trust.

This trust shall be used and administered exclusively for the purpose of AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

. Withdrawals may be made only for

payment of amounts required to be paid to the secretary of the treasury by an agreement entered into under AS

39.30.010

;

payment of the refunds provided for in AS

39.30.020(c)

; and

refunds of overpayments, not otherwise adjustable, made by a political subdivision or instrumentality.

History.

(§ 6 ch 95 SLA 1951; am § 4 ch 64 SLA 1968)

Sec. 39.30.050.
Administrative costs.

The department shall collect from each participating political subdivision its respective pro rata share of the expenses incurred in the administration of AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

. The amounts collected from participating political subdivisions, together with money appropriated by the state for covering the state’s share of administrative costs, shall be deposited in an FICA administration fund and are not allocable to any other purpose. Expenditures from the FICA administration fund shall be included in the governor’s budget for each fiscal year and are subject to appropriation by the legislature.
At the time of preparation of the governor’s annual budget the department shall review the FICA administration fund and adjust the rate of assessment on political subdivisions so as to prevent the accumulation of more money than is needed to administer AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 95 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.30.060.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt and publish the regulations not inconsistent with AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

that it finds necessary or appropriate to the efficient administration of its functions under AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 95 SLA 1951)

Sec. 39.30.070.
Studies and reports. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 39.30.080.
Definitions.

In AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

,

“department” means the Department of Administration;

“employee” includes an officer of a political subdivision of the state;

“employment” means any service performed by an employee of a political subdivision of the state, except (A) service that in the absence of an agreement entered into under AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

would constitute “employment” as defined in the Social Security Act; or (B) service that under the Social Security Act may not be included in an agreement between the state and the Federal Security Administrator entered into under AS

39.30.010

—

39.30.080

;

“Federal Insurance Contributions Act” means subchapter A of chapter 9 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code as amended;

“Federal Security Administrator” includes an individual to whom the Federal Security Administrator has delegated any functions under the Social Security Act with respect to coverage under that act of employees of states and territories and their political subdivisions;

“political subdivision” includes an instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision, or of the state and a political subdivision, but only if the instrumentality is a juristic entity legally separate and distinct from the state or the political subdivision and only if its employees are not, by virtue of their relation to the juristic entity, employees of the state or the political subdivision;

“Social Security Act” means the Act of Congress approved August 14, 1935, chapter 531, 49 Stat. 620, cited as the “Social Security Act,” including regulations and requirements issued under it, and its amendments;

“wages” means remuneration for employment, including the cash value of remuneration paid in any medium other than cash, except that “wages” does not include that part of remuneration that, even if it were for “employment” within the meaning of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, would not constitute “wages” within the meaning of that Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1951; am §§ 82, 83 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Editor’s notes. —

The Federal Insurance Contributions Act, referred to in paragraph (4), may be found in 26 U.S.C. §§ 3101 — 3125.

The Social Security Act, referred to in paragraph (7), may be found in 42 U.S.C. §§ 301 — 1397f.